Maine, session 132, LD949.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §9083, as amended by PL 2017, c. 210, Pt. B, §30, is further
amended to read:
§9083. Fees
Application and license fees for manufactured housing communities are set under
section 9021, subsection 2‑A, including applications for manufactured housing community
expansion and license renewal. Fees are also set under section 9021, subsection 2‑A for
manufactured housing community inspections; for the cost of reviewing engineering and
site plans; for costs incurred in evaluating an applicant’s eligibility for licensure as a
manufactured housing community; and for costs incurred in evaluating a licensee’s
ongoing compliance with the requirements of this subchapter and the rules of the board.
Failure to pay costs billed to an applicant or licensee within 90 days of the billing date
constitutes grounds for license revocation, unless an extension for an additional period not
to exceed 90 days is granted in writing by the board. A municipality shall accept a license
issued by the board as evidence a manufactured housing community meets all requirements
of this subchapter. A municipality may not charge any additional fees for a manufactured
housing community to operate.
Sec. 2. 10 MRSA §9088, sub-§6, as amended by PL 2007, c. 402, Pt. D, §15, is
repealed.
Sec. 3. 30-A MRSA §4358, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 552, §1, is further
amended to read:
2. Location of manufactured housing. Municipalities shall permit allow
manufactured housing to be placed or erected on individual house lots where single-family
dwellings are allowed, subject to the same requirements as single-family dwellings, except
as otherwise provided in this section.
Page 1 - 132LR2427(05)

A. Municipalities may establish design criteria, including, but not limited to, a pitched,
shingled roof; a permanent foundation; and exterior siding that is residential in
appearance, as long as:
(1) The requirements do not have the effect of circumventing the purposes of this
section; and
(2) The design requirements are not used to prevent the relocation of any
manufactured housing, regardless of its date of manufacture, that is legally sited
within the municipality as of August 4, 1988.
B. Providing one or more zones or locations where mobile home parks or mobile home
subdivisions or developments are allowed does not constitute compliance with this
section.
C. This section does not prohibit municipalities from establishing controls on
manufactured housing that are less restrictive than are permitted by this section.
D. Municipalities may not prohibit manufactured housing, regardless of its date of
manufacture, solely on the basis of a date of manufacture before June 14, 1976, or the
failure of a unit to have been manufactured in accordance with the National
Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, United States
Code, Title 42, Chapter 70. Municipalities may apply the design standards permitted
by this section to all manufactured housing, regardless of its date of manufacture, and
may apply reasonable safety standards to manufactured housing built before June 15,
1976, or not built in accordance with the National Manufactured Housing Construction
and Safety Standards Act of 1974, United States Code, Title 42, Chapter 70.
E. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, manufactured housing and
any modular home that meets construction standards for state-certified manufactured
housing adopted pursuant to Title 10, section 9042 must be allowed in all zones where
other single-family homes are allowed.
Page 2 - 132LR2427(05)